Rhode Island, session 2025, SB723.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-5-13.11 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-5 entitled "Levy and
Assessment of Local Taxes" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-5-13.11. Qualifying low-income housing — Assessment and taxation.
(a) Any residential property that has been issued an occupancy permit on or after January
1, 1995, after substantial rehabilitation as defined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban
Development and is encumbered by a covenant recorded in the land records in favor of a
governmental unit or Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation restricting either or
both the rents that may be charged to tenants of the property or the incomes of the occupants of the
property, is subject to a tax that equals eight percent (8%) of the property’s previous years’ gross
scheduled rental income or a lesser percentage as determined by each municipality.
(b) Any city or town whose low- or moderate-income housing units exceeds the ten percent
(10%) threshold outlined under chapter 53 of title 45 ("low and moderate income housing") shall
be exempt from the provisions of subsection (a) of this section for any and all properties that have
been issued an occupancy permit after December 31, 2024; provided, further, that any local city or
town council may, by passage of a resolution, elect not to be exempted under the provisions of
subsection (a) of this section.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001985
========
LC001985 - Page 2 of 3